createYaml/yaml_output/VII_IND_aa.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx: michaa
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx: michaawan
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv: michaani
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv: michaaniwan
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx: michaasinoon
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx: michaasinoon
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv: michaasinini
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv: michaasininiwan
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx: michaaban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx: [michaabaniin,michaabanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv: michaaniiban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv: [michaaniibaniin,michaaniibanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx: michaasinooban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx: [michaasinoobaniin,michaasinoobanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv: michaasininiiban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv: [michaasininiibaniin,michaasininiibanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx: michaadog
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx: michaadogenan
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv: michaaniwidog
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv: michaaniwidogenan
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx: michaasinodog
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx: michaasinodogenan
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv: michaasininiwidog
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv: michaasininiwidogenan
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+0SgProx: michaagoban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+0PlProx: [michaagobaniin,michaagobanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+0SgObv: michaanigoban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+0PlObv: [michaanigobaniin,michaagobanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+0SgProx: michaasinoogoban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+0PlProx: [michaasinoogobaniin,michaasinoogobanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+0SgObv: michaasininigoban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+0PlObv: [michaasininigobaniin,michaasininigobanen]
